Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,348
Minibikes and off-road vehicles; use; emergencies; parades.

Minibikes and all off-road vehicles, including but not limited to golf carts, go-carts, riding lawnmowers, garden tractors, and snowmobiles, shall be exempt from the provisions of sections 60-678 and 60-6,351 to 60-6,353 during any public emergency or while being used in parades by regularly organized units of any recognized charitable, social, educational, or community service organization.

Laws 1971, LB 644, § 7;

Laws 1972, LB 1196, § 6;

Laws 1987, LB 80, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2102;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 444.